District of Columbia statutes.
31-2601.01

Kinds of insurance prohibited.

No insurance shall be made by any person or persons, bodies politic or corporate, on any ship or ships, or on any goods, merchandise, or effects laden or to be laden on board of any ship or ships, interest or no interest, or without further proof of interest than the policy, or by way of gaming or wagering or without benefit of salvage to the insurer; and every such insurance shall be null and void to all intents and purposes.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1294, ch. 854, § 656
1981 Ed., § 35-1432.
1973 Ed., § 35-1133.